Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,248
Private onsite wastewater treatment system; professional required; when; registration; inspection and registration; director; powers; waiver of fees authorized.

(1) A private onsite wastewater treatment system shall not be sited, laid out, constructed, closed, reconstructed, altered, modified, repaired, inspected, or pumped unless the siting, layout, construction, closure, reconstruction, alteration, modification, repair, inspection, or pumping is carried out or supervised by either a certified professional as required by the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Contractors Certification and System Registration Act, a professional engineer licensed in Nebraska, or a registered environmental health specialist registered in Nebraska.

(2) Any private onsite wastewater treatment system constructed, reconstructed, altered, or modified by a certified professional, professional engineer licensed in Nebraska, or registered environmental health specialist registered in Nebraska shall be registered with the department by the certified professional, professional engineer, or registered environmental health specialist within forty-five days of completion of the construction, reconstruction, alteration, or modification. The certified professional, professional engineer, or registered environmental health specialist shall submit the registration on forms provided by the department and shall include the registration fee. The registration fee shall be fifty dollars until rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act provide a schedule of system registration fees adequate to cover direct and indirect program costs.

(3) The director by contract may delegate onsite wastewater treatment system inspection and registration to a governmental subdivision which has adopted a program at least as stringent as the requirements provided by the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Contractors Certification and System Registration Act and which has demonstrated authority to administer and enforce its onsite wastewater treatment system inspection and registration program.

(4) The director may waive certification and examination fees for inspectors employed by a governmental agency or subdivision which has adopted and has the authority to enforce an inspection and compliance program at least as stringent as the standards for siting, layout, construction, closure, reconstruction, alteration, modification, repair, inspection, and pumping provided by the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Contractors Certification and System Registration Act and rules and regulations under the act adopted and promulgated by the council.

Laws 2003, LB 94, § 13;

Laws 2004, LB 449, § 14;

Laws 2007, LB333, § 4.